Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1702, amend (1),
(2) introductory portion, (3)(a), (4)(a) introductory portion, (5)
introductory portion, and (7) as follows:
6-1-1702. Developer duty to avoid algorithmic discrimination
- required documentation. (1) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER
1, 2026, a developer of a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall use
reasonable care to protect consumers from any known or reasonably
foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended
and contracted uses of the high-risk artificial intelligence system. In any
enforcement action brought on or after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1,
2026, by the attorney general pursuant to section 6-1-1706, there is a
rebuttable presumption that a developer used reasonable care as required
under this section if the developer complied with this section and any
-2- 1008

additional requirements or obligations as set forth in rules promulgated
ADOPTED by the attorney general pursuant to section 6-1-1707.
(2) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and except
as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a developer of a high-risk
artificial intelligence system shall make available to the deployer or other
developer of the high-risk artificial intelligence system:
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a
developer that offers, sells, leases, licenses, gives, or otherwise makes
available to a deployer or other developer a high-risk artificial
intelligence system on or after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, shall
make available to the deployer or other developer, to the extent feasible,
the documentation and information, through artifacts such as model cards,
dataset cards, or other impact assessments, necessary for a deployer, or
for a third party contracted by a deployer, to complete an impact
assessment pursuant to section 6-1-1703 (3).
(4) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, a
developer shall make available, in a manner that is clear and readily
available on the developer's website or in a public use case inventory, a
statement summarizing:
(5) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, a developer
of a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall disclose to the attorney
general, in a form and manner prescribed by the attorney general, and to
all known deployers or other developers of the high-risk artificial
intelligence system, any known or reasonably foreseeable risks of
algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended uses of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system without unreasonable delay but no later than
ninety days after the date on which:
-3- 1008

(7) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, the attorney
general may require that a developer disclose to the attorney general, no
later than ninety days after the request and in a form and manner
prescribed by the attorney general, the statement or documentation
described in subsection (2) of this section. The attorney general may
evaluate such statement or documentation to ensure compliance with this
part 17, and the statement or documentation is not subject to disclosure
under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.
In a disclosure pursuant to this subsection (7), a developer may designate
the statement or documentation as including proprietary information or
a trade secret. To the extent that any information contained in the
statement or documentation includes information subject to
attorney-client privilege or work-product protection, the disclosure does
not constitute a waiver of the privilege or protection.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1703, amend (1),
(2)(a) introductory portion, (3)(a), (3)(c), (3)(g), (4)(a) introductory
portion, (4)(b) introductory portion, (5)(a) introductory portion, (7), and
(9) as follows:
6-1-1703. Deployer duty to avoid algorithmic discrimination
- risk management policy and program. (1) On and after February 1,
2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, a deployer of a high-risk artificial intelligence
system shall use reasonable care to protect consumers from any known or
reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination. In any
enforcement action brought on or after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1,
2026, by the attorney general pursuant to section 6-1-1706, there is a
rebuttable presumption that a deployer of a high-risk artificial intelligence
system used reasonable care as required under this section if the deployer
-4- 1008

complied with this section and any additional requirements or obligations
as set forth in rules promulgated ADOPTED by the attorney general
pursuant to section 6-1-1707.
(2) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and
except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a deployer of a
high-risk artificial intelligence system shall implement a risk management
policy and program to govern the deployer's deployment of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system. The risk management policy and program
must specify and incorporate the principles, processes, and personnel that
the deployer uses to identify, document, and mitigate known or
reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination. The risk
management policy and program must be an iterative process planned,
implemented, and regularly and systematically reviewed and updated over
the life cycle of a high-risk artificial intelligence system, requiring
regular, systematic review and updates. A risk management policy and
program implemented and maintained pursuant to this subsection (2) must
be reasonable considering:
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsections (3)(d), (3)(e), and (6) of
this section:
(I) A deployer, or a third party contracted by the deployer, that
deploys a high-risk artificial intelligence system on or after February 1,
2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, shall complete an impact assessment for the
high-risk artificial intelligence system; and
(II) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, a deployer,
or a third party contracted by the deployer, shall complete an impact
assessment for a deployed high-risk artificial intelligence system at least
annually and within ninety days after any intentional and substantial
-5- 1008

modification to the high-risk artificial intelligence system is made
available.
(c) In addition to the information required under subsection (3)(b)
of this section, an impact assessment completed pursuant to this
subsection (3) following an intentional and substantial modification to a
high-risk artificial intelligence system on or after February 1, 2026
OCTOBER 1, 2026, must include a statement disclosing the extent to which
the high-risk artificial intelligence system was used in a manner that was
consistent with, or varied from, the developer's intended uses of the
high-risk artificial intelligence system.
(g) On or before February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and at least
annually thereafter, a deployer, or a third party contracted by the deployer,
must review the deployment of each high-risk artificial intelligence
system deployed by the deployer to ensure that the high-risk artificial
intelligence system is not causing algorithmic discrimination.
(4) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and no
later than the time that a deployer deploys a high-risk artificial
intelligence system to make, or be a substantial factor in making, a
consequential decision concerning a consumer, the deployer shall:
(b) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, a deployer
that has deployed a high-risk artificial intelligence system to make, or be
a substantial factor in making, a consequential decision concerning a
consumer shall, if the consequential decision is adverse to the consumer,
provide to the consumer:
(5) (a) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and
except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a deployer shall make
available, in a manner that is clear and readily available on the deployer's
-6- 1008

website, a statement summarizing:
(7) If a deployer deploys a high-risk artificial intelligence system
on or after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and subsequently
discovers that the high-risk artificial intelligence system has caused
algorithmic discrimination, the deployer, without unreasonable delay, but
no later than ninety days after the date of the discovery, shall send to the
attorney general, in a form and manner prescribed by the attorney general,
a notice disclosing the discovery.
(9) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, the attorney
general may require that a deployer, or a third party contracted by the
deployer, disclose to the attorney general, no later than ninety days after
the request and in a form and manner prescribed by the attorney general,
the risk management policy implemented pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the impact assessment completed pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section, or the records maintained pursuant to subsection (3)(f) of
this section. The attorney general may evaluate the risk management
policy, impact assessment, or records to ensure compliance with this part
17, and the risk management policy, impact assessment, and records are
not subject to disclosure under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2
of article 72 of title 24. In a disclosure pursuant to this subsection (9), a
deployer may designate the statement or documentation as including
proprietary information or a trade secret. To the extent that any
information contained in the risk management policy, impact assessment,
or records includes information subject to attorney-client privilege or
work-product protection, the disclosure does not constitute a waiver of
the privilege or protection.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1704, amend (1)
-7- 1008

as follows:
6-1-1704. Disclosure of an artificial intelligence system to
consumer. (1) On and after February 1, 2026 OCTOBER 1, 2026, and
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a deployer or other
developer that deploys, offers, sells, leases, licenses, gives, or otherwise
makes available an artificial intelligence system that is intended to
interact with consumers shall ensure the disclosure to each consumer who
interacts with the artificial intelligence system that the consumer is
interacting with an artificial intelligence system.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-8- 1008